Wyoming statutes. Title 28 Legislature
Article 1. In General

§ 28-7-101.
Registration; reports.

As used in W.S.

28-7-101

through

28-7-104

“lobby” or “as a lobbyist” means to attempt to influence legislation.

Any person, who, on behalf of any association, corporation, labor union, public, nonprofit or private special interest group or any interest other than personal, is receiving or has a reasonable expectation of receiving expense reimbursement or compensation in excess of five hundred dollars ($500.00) in a reporting period defined under W.S. 28-7-201(c), as a lobbyist shall, before, or within forty-eight (48) hours of, commencing lobbying activities during a reporting period as defined under W.S. 28-7-201(c), register with the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall collect a registration fee of seventy-five dollars ($75.00) at time of registration, which shall be deposited with the state treasurer to be placed in the general fund. Any person who is not receiving or has no reasonable expectation of receiving expense reimbursement or compensation in excess of five hundred dollars ($500.00), or who shall receive no compensation beyond travel and per diem expenses for lobbying activities under this chapter shall pay a registration fee of ten dollars ($10.00) to the secretary of state at the time of registration. Registration shall state:

The name and business address of the individual registering;

The name and business address of the association, corporation, labor union, public, nonprofit or private special interest group which the person represents.

Not later than March 1 of each year the secretary of state shall make available a report of the registrations to all duly elected members of the house of representatives, the senate, state elected officials and any other person requesting a copy of the report.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 222, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 28-70.25; 1998, ch. 112, § 2; 2021 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in (b), substituted "seventy-five dollars ($75.00)" for "twenty-five dollars ($25.00)" in the second sentence and "ten dollars ($10.00)" for "five dollars ($5.00)" in the the third sentence.

§ 28-7-102.
Penalties.

Any person or individual failing to register as a lobbyist with the secretary of state shall be guilty of a misdemeanor subject to a fine of not more than two hundred dollars ($200.00).

Any person or organization failing to file a lobbyist activity report required under W.S.

28-7-201

or who files a lobbyist activity report containing information which the lobbyist knows to be false is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00). Upon a second or subsequent conviction under this section, any person or organization shall have his right to be a registered lobbyist revoked by the secretary of state for a period of up to two (2) years in addition to any fine.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 222, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 28-70.26; 1998, ch. 112, § 2; 2011, ch. 129, § 301.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b), substituted “W.S.

28-7-201

” for “this section.”

§ 28-7-103.
No infringement of right to petition or communicate with legislature.

Nothing in the provisions of this article shall be construed to prohibit or infringe upon the right of a citizen as an individual to petition or to address written or oral communications to members of the legislature.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 222, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 28-70.27; 2011, ch. 129, § 301.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “article” for “act.”

§ 28-7-104.
Chapter inapplicable to public official.

This article shall not apply to any public official acting in his official capacity.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 222, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 28-70.28; 2011, ch. 129, § 301.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “article” for “act.”